Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5323XS (6) 91 ak/ko S.F. 2154 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 139A.27 Distribution of gene-based 1 vaccines ââ restrictions and penalties. 2 1. For purposes of this section, unless the context 3 otherwise requires: 4 a. âDeoxyribonucleic acid contaminationâ means an unintended 5 residual deoxyribonucleic acid fragment remains in a 6 manufactured gene-based vaccine. 7 b. âDistributeâ means the delivery of a vaccine to an 8 individual patient. 9 c. âGene-based vaccineâ means a vaccine developed using 10 messenger ribonucleic acid technology, modified messenger 11 riboucleic acid technology, self-amplifying messenger 12 ribonucleic acid technology, or deoxyribonucleic acid 13 technology. 14 d. âSheddingâ means the process by which weakened components 15 of a vaccine are released from a vaccinated individual into the 16 environment. 17 e. âTransmissionâ means the process by which components of 18 a vaccine are spread from an individual who has been vaccinated 19 to an unvaccinated individual. 20 2. A manufacturer shall conduct integrative 21 transmissibility, deoxyribonucleic acid contamination, 22 and shedding studies prior to the distribution of a gene-based 23 vaccine within the state. 24 3. A person that distributes within the state a gene-based 25 vaccine that poses an unreasonable risk of harm to public 26 health through transmission or shedding as determined by the 27 United States food and drug administration may be subject to 28 a fine of one thousand dollars per occurrence, and licensee 29 discipline pursuant to section 148.6, if applicable. 30 4. A manufacturer that distributes, sells, or uses a 31 gene-based vaccine within the state shall not be immune from 32 liability arising from injury or death caused by a design 33 defect in the gene-based vaccine. 34 5. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 35 -1- LSB 5323XS (6) 91 ak/ko 1/ 2 S.F. 2154 shall promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 17A to enforce and 1 administer this section. 2